Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-10,115
Class IV or V school district; sale of property; conditions.

School property of any kind belonging to any Class IV or V district shall not be sold by the board of education except at a regular meeting and with an affirmative recorded vote of at least two-thirds of all the members of the board.

Laws 1917, c. 225, § 19, p. 554;

C.S.1922, § 6628;

C.S.1929, § 79-2619;

R.S.1943, § 79-2619;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 217, p. 762;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-530;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 761.